Maryland, session 2025, SB0029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM” MEANS:
(I) THE CARROLL COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
(II) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(3) “INSTRUCTIONAL TIME” MEANS ANY TIME DURING THE SCHOOL
DAY, EXCEPT A STUDENT’S LUNCH PERIOD.

SENATE BILL 29
(4) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE PHONE–FREE SCHOOLS PILOT
PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A PHONE–FREE SCHOOLS PILOT PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO COLLECT DATA TO
DETERMINE THE EFFECT OF LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM POLICIES THAT LIMIT STUDENT
USE OF CELL PHONES DURING THE SCHOOL DAY ON:
(1) ACADEMIC ACHIEVEMENT;
(2) STUDENT CLASSROOM ENGAGEMENT;
(3) STUDENT SOCIAL INTERACTIONS; AND
(4) STUDENT BEHAVIOR AND DISCIPLINE.
(D) (1) EACH ELIGIBLE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SELECT ONE
MIDDLE SCHOOL AND ONE HIGH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PILOT PROGRAM.
(2) EACH ELIGIBLE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY THAT PROHIBITS
STUDENT CELL PHONE USE DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME; AND
(II) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES TO ENFORCE THE POLICY,
INCLUDING APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS.
(3) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT
PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING A CELL PHONE:
(I) FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SECTION 504 PLAN;
(II) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S DOCUMENTED
HEALTH ISSUE; OR
(III) WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR OR ADMINISTRATOR
FOR EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES.
(E) (1) EACH ELIGIBLE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL COLLECT DATA
REGARDING THE STUDENT CELL PHONE USE POLICY, INCLUDING:

SENATE BILL 29 3
(I) ACADEMIC ACHIEVEMENT OF STUDENTS IN THE SCHOOL;
(II) STUDENT CLASSROOM ENGAGEMENT;
(III) STUDENT SOCIAL INTERACTIONS, INCLUDING BULLYING,
CYBERBULLYING, AND HARASSMENT;
(IV) STUDENT BEHAVIOR AND DISCIPLINE;
(V) ENFORCEMENT CHALLENGES;
(VI) STUDENT FEEDBACK ON THE POLICY;
(VII) TEACHER FEEDBACK ON THE POLICY; AND
(VIII) PARENT OR GUARDIAN FEEDBACK ON THE POLICY.
(2) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, EACH ELIGIBLE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT BASED ON THE DATA COLLECTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PILOT PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.